Wisconsin, session 2025, AB789.
do enact as follows:AB789,15Section 1. Agreement ratified. The legislature ratifies the tentative 1agreement negotiated for the 2025-27 biennium between the state of Wisconsin, the 2division of personnel management in the department of administration, and the 3Wisconsin Law Enforcement Association, covering employees in the public safety 4collective bargaining unit under subch. V of ch. 111, as approved by the employees of 5the public safety collective bargaining unit and approved and recommended by the 6joint committee on employment relations, and authorizes the necessary 7expenditure of moneys for implementation from the appropriations made by s. 820.865 (1), subject to s. 20.865 (intro.). The administrator of the division of 9personnel management in the department of administration shall file an official 10copy of the agreement, certified by the cochairpersons of the joint committee on 11employment relations, with the secretary of state. No formal or informal agreement 12between the parties that is not a part of the official copy is deemed to be approved by 13the legislature under this act.AB789,214Section 2. Effective date.AB789,2,1815(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, except that those 16provisions specifically identified as having other effective dates in the agreement 17covering employees in the public safety collective bargaining unit are effective on 18the dates provided in that agreement.AB789,2,1919